Maryland, session 2026, HB0280.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Insurance
15–144.
– 1 –

Ch. 11 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(2) “Carrier” means:
(i) an insurer that holds a certificate of authority in the State and
provides health insurance in the State;
(ii) a health maintenance organization that is licensed to operate in
the State;
(iii) a nonprofit health service plan that is licensed to operate in the
State; or
(iv) any other person or organization that provides health benefit
plans subject to State insurance regulation.
(3) “CORE TREATMENT” MEANS A STANDARD TREATMENT OR
COURSE OF TREATMENT, THERAPY, SERVICE, OR INTERVENTION INDICATED BY
GENERALLY RECOGNIZED INDEPENDENT STANDARDS OF CURRENT MEDICAL
PRACTICE.
[(3)] (4) “Health benefit plan” means:
(i) for a large group or blanket plan, a health benefit plan as defined
in § 15–1401 of this title;
(ii) for a small group plan, a health benefit plan as defined in §
15–1201 of this title;
(iii) for an individual plan:
1. a health benefit plan as defined in § 15–1301(l) of this title;
or
2. an individual health benefit plan as defined in §
15–1301(o) of this title;
(iv) short–term limited duration insurance as defined in § 15–1301(s)
of this title; or
(v) a student health plan as defined in § 15–1318(a) of this title.
[(4)] (5) “Medical/surgical benefits” has the meaning stated in 45 C.F.R.
§ 146.136(a) and 29 C.F.R. § 2590.712(a).
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 11
[(5)] (6) (I) “Mental health benefits” [has the meaning stated in 45
C.F.R. § 146.136(a) and 29 C.F.R. § 2590.712(a)] MEANS BENEFITS WITH RESPECT TO
ITEMS OR SERVICES FOR MENTAL HEALTH CONDITIONS THAT ARE DEFINED UNDER
THE TERMS OF A HEALTH BENEFIT PLAN AND IN ACCORDANCE WITH APPLICABLE
FEDERAL AND STATE LAW, INCLUDING REQUIREMENTS THAT:
1. ANY CONDITION DEFINED UNDER THE TERMS OF THE
HEALTH BENEFIT PLAN AS BEING OR AS NOT BEING A MENTAL HEALTH CONDITION
BE DEFINED CONSISTENT WITH GENERALLY RECOGNIZED INDEPENDENT
STANDARDS OF CURRENT MEDICAL PRACTICE AND INCLUDE ALL CONDITIONS,
EXCEPT FOR SUBSTANCE USE DISORDERS, COVERED UNDER THE HEALTH BENEFIT
PLAN THAT:
A. FALL UNDER ANY OF THE DIAGNOSTIC CATEGORIES
LISTED IN THE MENTAL, BEHAVIORAL, AND NEURODEVELOPMENTAL DISORDERS
CHAPTER, OR EQUIVALENT CHAPTER, OF THE MOST RECENT VERSION OF THE
WORLD HEALTH ORGANIZATION’S INTERNATIONAL CLASSIFICATION OF DISEASES
ADOPTED BY THE FEDERAL DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES; OR
B. ARE LISTED IN THE MOST RECENT VERSION OF THE
AMERICAN PSYCHIATRIC ASSOCIATION’S DIAGNOSTIC AND STATISTICAL MANUAL
OF MENTAL DISORDERS; AND
2. TO THE EXTENT GENERALLY RECOGNIZED
INDEPENDENT STANDARDS OF CURRENT MEDICAL PRACTICE DO NOT ADDRESS
WHETHER A CONDITION IS A MENTAL HEALTH CONDITION, THE CONDITION BE
DEFINED IN ACCORDANCE WITH APPLICABLE FEDERAL AND STATE LAW.
(II) “MENTAL HEALTH BENEFITS” DOES NOT INCLUDE
MEDICAL/SURGICAL BENEFITS OR SUBSTANCE USE DISORDER BENEFITS.
[(6)] (7) “Nonquantitative treatment limitation” means treatment
limitations as defined in 45 C.F.R. § 146.136(a) and 29 C.F.R. § 2590.712(a).
[(7)] (8) (i) “Parity Act” means the Paul Wellstone and Pete Domenici
Mental Health Parity and Addiction Equity Act of 2008, as amended.
(ii) “Parity Act” includes 45 C.F.R. § 146.136, 29 C.F.R. § 2590.712,
and any other related federal regulations found in the Code of Federal Regulations to
implement or enforce the Paul Wellstone and Pete Domenici Mental Health Parity and
Addiction Equity Act of 2008.
[(8)] (9) “Parity Act classification” means:
– 3 –

Ch. 11 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(i) inpatient in–network benefits;
(ii) inpatient out–of–network benefits;
(iii) outpatient in–network benefits;
(iv) outpatient out–of–network benefits;
(v) prescription drug benefits; and
(vi) emergency care benefits.
[(9)] (10) “Product” has the meaning stated in § 15–1309(a)(3) of this title.
[(10)] (11) (I) “Substance use disorder benefits” [has the meaning stated
in 45 C.F.R. § 146.136(a) and 29 C.F.R. § 2590.712(a)] MEANS BENEFITS WITH RESPECT
TO ITEMS OR SERVICES FOR SUBSTANCE USE DISORDERS THAT ARE DEFINED UNDER
THE TERMS OF A HEALTH BENEFIT PLAN AND IN ACCORDANCE WITH APPLICABLE
FEDERAL AND STATE LAW, INCLUDING REQUIREMENTS THAT:
1. ANY DISORDER DEFINED UNDER THE TERMS OF THE
HEALTH BENEFIT PLAN AS BEING OR AS NOT BEING A SUBSTANCE USE DISORDER BE
DEFINED CONSISTENT WITH GENERALLY RECOGNIZED INDEPENDENT STANDARDS
OF CURRENT MEDICAL PRACTICE AND INCLUDE ALL DISORDERS COVERED UNDER
THE HEALTH BENEFIT PLAN THAT:
A. FALL UNDER ANY OF THE DIAGNOSTIC CATEGORIES
LISTED AS A MENTAL OR BEHAVIORAL DISORDER DUE TO PSYCHOACTIVE
SUBSTANCE USE, OR EQUIVALENT CATEGORY, IN THE MENTAL, BEHAVIORAL, AND
NEURODEVELOPMENTAL DISORDERS CHAPTER, OR EQUIVALENT CHAPTER, OF THE
MOST RECENT VERSION OF THE WORLD HEALTH ORGANIZATION’S INTERNATIONAL
CLASSIFICATION OF DISEASES ADOPTED BY THE FEDERAL DEPARTMENT OF
HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES; OR
B. ARE LISTED AS A SUBSTANCE–RELATED AND
ADDICTIVE DISORDER, OR EQUIVALENT CATEGORY, IN THE MOST RECENT VERSION
OF THE AMERICAN PSYCHIATRIC ASSOCIATION’S DIAGNOSTIC AND STATISTICAL
MANUAL OF MENTAL DISORDERS; AND
2. TO THE EXTENT GENERALLY RECOGNIZED
INDEPENDENT STANDARDS OF CURRENT MEDICAL PRACTICE DO NOT ADDRESS
WHETHER A DISORDER IS A SUBSTANCE USE DISORDER, THE DISORDER SHALL BE
– 4 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 11
DEFINED UNDER THE TERMS OF THE HEALTH BENEFIT PLAN IN ACCORDANCE WITH
APPLICABLE FEDERAL AND STATE LAW.
(II) “SUBSTANCE USE DISORDER BENEFITS” DOES NOT
INCLUDE MEDICAL/SURGICAL BENEFITS OR MENTAL HEALTH BENEFITS.
(c) (1) Each carrier subject to this section shall:
(i) for each Parity Act classification, identify all nonquantitative
treatment limitations that are applied to mental health benefits, substance use disorder
benefits, and medical/surgical benefits;
(ii) in accordance with the Parity Act AND ANY STATE
REGULATIONS ADOPTED UNDER SUBSECTION (O) OF THIS SECTION, perform and
document comparative analyses of the design and application of all nonquantitative
treatment limitations imposed on mental health benefits and substance use disorder
benefits;
(III) 1. COLLECT AND EVALUATE RELEVANT DATA IN A
MANNER REASONABLY DESIGNED TO ASSESS THE IMPACT OF EACH
NONQUANTITATIVE TREATMENT LIMITATION ON RELEVANT OUTCOMES RELATED
TO ACCESS TO MENTAL HEALTH AND SUBSTANCE USE DISORDER BENEFITS AND
MEDICAL/SURGICAL BENEFITS; AND
2. WITH RESPECT TO NONQUANTITATIVE TREATMENT
LIMITATIONS RELATED TO NETWORK COMPOSITION, COLLECT AND EVALUATE
RELEVANT DATA IN A MANNER REASONABLY DESIGNED TO ASSESS THE AGGREGATE
IMPACT OF ALL THE NONQUANTITATIVE TREATMENT LIMITATIONS ON ACCESS TO
MENTAL HEALTH AND SUBSTANCE USE DISORDER BENEFITS AND
MEDICAL/SURGICAL BENEFITS;
[(iii)] (IV) provide the comparative analysis, INCLUDING THE
EVALUATION OF RELEVANT DATA, for each nonquantitative treatment limitation
requested by the Commissioner within:
1. 15 working days after a written request; or
2. if adopted by the federal government, less than 15 working
days to align with the federal rule or regulation;
[(iv)] (V) within 30 days after a written request, provide the
comparative analysis for each nonquantitative treatment limitation and related in
operation data analysis, if available and requested by a member in accordance with the
Parity Act disclosure requirements or, for members with individual plans, in accordance
with subsection [(e)(7)] (E)(8) of this section; and
– 5 –

Ch. 11 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
[(v)] (VI) submit the reports required under paragraph (2) of this
subsection.
(3) The report submitted under paragraph (2) of this subsection shall
include the following information:
(ii) the results of a comparative analysis, INCLUDING THE
EVALUATION OF RELEVANT DATA, conducted by the carrier on not fewer than five
nonquantitative treatment limitations selected by the Commissioner in accordance with
paragraph (5) of this subsection; and
(7) IF THE RELEVANT DATA EVALUATED UNDER PARAGRAPH (1)(III)
OF THIS SUBSECTION INDICATE THAT THE NONQUANTITATIVE TREATMENT
LIMITATION CONTRIBUTES TO MATERIAL DIFFERENCES IN ACCESS TO MENTAL
HEALTH AND SUBSTANCE USE DISORDER BENEFITS AS COMPARED TO
MEDICAL/SURGICAL BENEFITS IN A PARITY ACT CLASSIFICATION:
(I) THE DIFFERENCES SHALL BE CONSIDERED A STRONG
INDICATOR OF NONCOMPLIANCE WITH THE PARITY ACT AND MAY SUBJECT THE
CARRIER TO THE PROVISIONS OF SUBSECTION (K) OF THIS SECTION; AND
(II) THE CARRIER SHALL SUBMIT TO THE COMMISSIONER
DOCUMENTATION OF REASONABLE ACTIONS THAT HAVE BEEN OR ARE BEING TAKEN
TO ADDRESS THE MATERIAL DIFFERENCES TO ENSURE COMPLIANCE, IN
OPERATION, WITH THE PARITY ACT WITHIN 15 WORKING DAYS OF A REQUEST FROM
THE COMMISSIONER FOR THE DOCUMENTATION IN ACCORDANCE WITH THIS
SECTION.
(d) (1) A carrier subject to this section shall conduct a comparative analysis
for the nonquantitative treatment limitations selected under subsection (c)(5) of this section
as nonquantitative treatment limitations are:
(i) written; and
(ii) in operation.
(2) The comparative analysis of the nonquantitative treatment limitations
selected under subsection (c)(5) of this section shall:
(i) demonstrate that the processes, strategies, evidentiary
standards, or other factors used in designing and applying each selected nonquantitative
treatment limitation to mental health benefits and substance use disorder benefits in each
Parity Act classification are comparable to, and are applied no more stringently than, the
– 6 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 11
processes, strategies, evidentiary standards, or other factors used in designing and
applying each selected nonquantitative treatment limitation to medical/surgical benefits
within the same Parity Act classification; [and]
(II) DEMONSTRATE THAT NONE OF THE INFORMATION,
EVIDENCE, SOURCES, OR STANDARDS ON WHICH A FACTOR OR EVIDENTIARY
STANDARD IS BASED ARE BIASED OR NOT OBJECTIVE IN A MANNER THAT
DISCRIMINATES AGAINST MENTAL HEALTH OR SUBSTANCE USE DISORDER
BENEFITS AS COMPARED TO MEDICAL/SURGICAL BENEFITS;
(III) IN ACCORDANCE WITH THE PROVISIONS OF PARAGRAPH (3)
OF THIS SUBSECTION, DEMONSTRATE THAT THE HEALTH BENEFIT PLAN PROVIDES
MEANINGFUL BENEFITS FOR EACH COVERED MENTAL HEALTH CONDITION AND
SUBSTANCE USE DISORDER IN EVERY PARITY ACT CLASSIFICATION IN WHICH
MEDICAL/SURGICAL BENEFITS ARE PROVIDED; AND
[(ii)] (IV) include all information required under the Parity Act AND
ANY STATE REGULATIONS ADOPTED UNDER SUBSECTION (O) OF THIS SECTION.
(3) (I) THE BENEFITS PROVIDED FOR THE MENTAL HEALTH
CONDITION OR SUBSTANCE USE DISORDER SHALL BE COMPARED TO THE BENEFITS
PROVIDED FOR MEDICAL CONDITIONS AND SURGICAL PROCEDURES IN EACH
PARITY ACT CLASSIFICATION TO DETERMINE WHETHER BENEFITS ARE
MEANINGFUL.
(II) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED UNDER SUBPARAGRAPH (III) OF THIS
PARAGRAPH, BENEFITS ARE NOT MEANINGFUL UNLESS COVERAGE IS PROVIDED
FOR A CORE TREATMENT FOR THE MENTAL HEALTH CONDITION OR SUBSTANCE USE
DISORDER IN EACH CLASSIFICATION IN WHICH COVERAGE IS PROVIDED FOR A CORE
TREATMENT FOR ONE OR MORE MEDICAL CONDITIONS OR SURGICAL PROCEDURES.
(III) IF THERE IS NO CORE TREATMENT FOR A COVERED MENTAL
HEALTH CONDITION OR SUBSTANCE USE DISORDER WITH RESPECT TO A PARITY
ACT CLASSIFICATION, THE HEALTH BENEFIT PLAN:
1. IS NOT REQUIRED TO PROVIDE BENEFITS FOR A CORE
TREATMENT FOR THE COVERED MENTAL HEALTH CONDITION OR SUBSTANCE USE
DISORDER IN THAT PARITY ACT CLASSIFICATION; AND
2. IS REQUIRED TO PROVIDE BENEFITS FOR THE
COVERED MENTAL HEALTH CONDITION OR SUBSTANCE USE DISORDER IN EVERY
PARITY ACT CLASSIFICATION IN WHICH MEDICAL/SURGICAL BENEFITS ARE
PROVIDED.
– 7 –

Ch. 11 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
[(3)] (4) Regardless of whether it was used before the Parity Act was
enacted and as requested by the [Commission] COMMISSIONER, a carrier shall perform
and provide a comparative analysis for each process, strategy, evidentiary standard, or
other factor used in designing and applying a selected nonquantitative treatment limitation
used during a reporting period.
(e) In providing the analysis required under subsection (d) of this section, a
carrier shall:
(1) identify the factors used to determine that a nonquantitative treatment
limitation will apply to a benefit, including:
(i) the sources for the factors; AND
[(ii) the factors that were considered but rejected; and]
[(iii)] (II) if a factor was given more weight than another, the reason
for the difference in weighting;
(2) identify and define the specific evidentiary standards used to define the
factors and any other evidence relied on in designing each nonquantitative treatment
limitation;
(3) include the results of the audits, reviews, and analyses performed on
the nonquantitative treatment limitations identified under subsection (c)(5) of this section
to conduct the analysis required under subsection (d)(2) of this section for the plans and
products as written;
(4) include the RELEVANT DATA EVALUATED UNDER SUBSECTION
(C)(1)(III) OF THIS SECTION AND THE results of the audits, reviews, and analyses
performed on the nonquantitative treatment limitations identified under subsection (c)(5)
of this section to conduct the analysis required under subsection (d)(2) of this section for
the plans and products as in operation;
(5) IF THE RELEVANT DATA EVALUATED UNDER SUBSECTION
(C)(1)(III) OF THIS SECTION INDICATE THAT THE NONQUANTITATIVE TREATMENT
LIMITATION CONTRIBUTES TO MATERIAL DIFFERENCES IN ACCESS TO MENTAL
HEALTH AND SUBSTANCE USE DISORDER BENEFITS AS COMPARED TO
MEDICAL/SURGICAL BENEFITS IN A PARITY ACT CLASSIFICATION, INCLUDE AN
EXPLANATION OF THE DIFFERENCES AND A DISCUSSION OF THE ACTIONS THAT
HAVE BEEN OR ARE BEING TAKEN BY THE CARRIER TO ADDRESS THE DIFFERENCES;
[(5)] (6) identify the measures used to ensure comparable design and
application of nonquantitative treatment limitations that are implemented by the carrier
– 8 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 11
and any entity delegated by the carrier to manage mental health benefits, substance use
disorder benefits, or medical/surgical benefits on behalf of the carrier;
[(6)] (7) disclose the specific findings and conclusions reached by the
carrier that indicate that the health benefit plan is in compliance with this section and the
Parity Act; and
[(7)] (8) identify the process used to comply with the Parity Act disclosure
requirements for mental health benefits, substance use disorder benefits, and
medical/surgical benefits, including:
(i) the criteria for a medical necessity determination;
(ii) reasons for a denial of benefits; and
(iii) in connection with a member’s request for individual or group
plan information and for purposes of filing an internal coverage or grievance matter and
appeals, plan documents that contain information about processes, strategies, evidentiary
standards, and any other factors used to apply a nonquantitative treatment limitation.
(i) (1) The Commissioner shall:
(i) review each report submitted in accordance with subsections (c),
(d), and (f) of this section to assess each carrier’s compliance with the Parity Act AND ANY
STATE REGULATIONS ADOPTED UNDER SUBSECTION (O) OF THIS SECTION for each
Parity Act classification;
(ii) notify a carrier in writing of any noncompliance with the Parity
Act OR ANY STATE REGULATIONS ADOPTED UNDER SUBSECTION (O) OF THIS
SECTION before issuing an administrative order; and
(iii) within 90 days after the notice of noncompliance is issued, allow
the carrier to:
1. submit a compliance plan to the Administration to comply
with the Parity Act AND ANY STATE REGULATIONS ADOPTED UNDER SUBSECTION (O)
OF THIS SECTION; and
2. reprocess any claims that were improperly denied, in
whole or in part, because of the noncompliance.
(k) If, as a result of the review required under subsection (i)(1)(i) of this section,
the Commissioner finds that the carrier failed to comply with the Parity Act OR ANY STATE
REGULATIONS ADOPTED UNDER SUBSECTION (O) OF THIS SECTION, and did not
submit a compliance plan to adequately correct the noncompliance, the Commissioner may:
– 9 –

Ch. 11 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(1) issue an administrative order that requires:
(i) the carrier or an entity delegated by the carrier to cease the
noncompliant conduct or practice; or
(ii) the carrier to provide a payment that has been denied improperly
because of the noncompliance; or
(2) impose any other penalty or take any action as authorized:
(i) for an insurer, nonprofit health service plan, or any other person
subject to this section, under this article; or
(ii) for a health maintenance organization, under this article or the
Health – General Article.
(l) (1) A carrier shall have the burden of persuasion in demonstrating that its
design and application of a nonquantitative treatment limitation complies with the Parity
Act AND ANY STATE REGULATIONS ADOPTED UNDER SUBSECTION (O) OF THIS
SECTION:
(i) in any review conducted by the Commissioner under this section;
or
(ii) in any complaint investigation or market conduct action
undertaken by the Commissioner that involves the application of the Parity Act.
(o) The Commissioner shall, in consultation with interested stakeholders, adopt
regulations to implement this section, including to ensure uniform definitions and
methodology for the reporting requirements established under this section.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026.
Approved by the Governor, April 14, 2026.
– 10 –